Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
PART 1 General Provisions

47-20-30.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Amendment” means any amendment, including a substitute bill, made to a retirement bill by any committee of the House or Senate or by the House or Senate.

“LC number” means that number preceded by the letters “LC” assigned to a bill by the Office of Legislative Counsel when that office prepares a bill for a member of the General Assembly.

“Nonfiscal amendment” means an amendment to a retirement bill having a fiscal impact, which amendment does not change any factor of an actuarial investigation specified in subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-36.

“Nonfiscal retirement bill” means a retirement bill which does not affect the cost or funding factors of a retirement system or a retirement bill which affects such factors only in a manner which does not:

Grant a benefit increase under the retirement system affected by the bill;

Create an actuarial accrued liability for or increase the actuarial accrued liability of the retirement system affected by the bill; or

Increase the normal cost of the retirement system affected by the bill.

(4.1)

“Nonfiscal retirement bill” also means a retirement bill which removes or increases a mandatory retirement age of a retirement system or which removes or modifies provisions of a retirement system requiring forfeiture of benefits upon failure to retire upon reaching a mandatory retirement age or which provides for any combination of the foregoing.

“Reduction in cost amendment” means an amendment to a retirement bill having a fiscal impact which reduces the cost of the bill as such cost is determined by the actuarial investigation for the bill prepared pursuant to Code Section 47-20-36.

“Retirement bill having a fiscal impact” means any retirement bill creating or establishing a retirement system and any other retirement bill other than a nonfiscal retirement bill. Such term shall include any bill requiring a public retirement system to divest or refrain from investing in specific investments or classes of investments.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-30

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1368, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 146, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 30, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 240, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 767, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 1094, § 2/SB 327.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added the last sentence in paragraph (6).

47-20-31.
Retirement bills must carry legislative counsel number when introduced; changes in bills prior to introduction.

No retirement bill may be introduced by any member of the General Assembly unless, at the time of its introduction, the bill has printed thereon in the upper right portion of each page of the bill an LC number. Once a retirement bill is presented by the Office of Legislative Counsel to a member of the General Assembly, neither the Office of Legislative Counsel nor any person shall make any change in the retirement bill prior to its introduction into the General Assembly unless the bill is returned to the Office of Legislative Counsel and that office assigns a new LC number to the bill.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-20-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1368, § 1.